Colorado, session 2026A, HB1254.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-3-103, add (9.6)
as follows:
2-3-103. Duties of state auditor - definitions.
(9.6) (a) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT
OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(I) "STATE AGENCY" MEANS A PRINCIPAL DEPARTMENT OF THE
EXECUTIVE BRANCH OF STATE GOVERNMENT OR ANY DIVISION OR
PROGRAM WITHIN A PRINCIPAL DEPARTMENT.
(II) "NONCOMPLIANT STATE AGENCY" MEANS A STATE AGENCY
THAT:
(A) WAS SUBJECT TO AN AUDIT THAT IDENTIFIED A SIGNIFICANT
PROBLEM OR A MATERIAL WEAKNESS IN THE STATE AGENCY;
(B) HAS, AT A HEARING OF THE LEGISLATIVE AUDIT COMMITTEE,
AGREED OR PARTIALLY AGREED TO THE AUDIT RECOMMENDATION AND
SELECTED A DATE FOR IMPLEMENTING THE AUDITOR'S RECOMMENDATION;
AND
(C) HAS NOT COMPLETED THE AUDIT RECOMMENDATION BY THAT
IMPLEMENTATION DATE.
-2- HB26-1254

(b) IF A STATE AGENCY BECOMES A NONCOMPLIANT STATE
AGENCY, THE LEGISLATIVE AUDIT COMMITTEE SHALL, AT ITS NEXT
REGULAR MEETING AND WITH A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE NONCOMPLIANT
STATE AGENCY PRESENT, DETERMINE WHETHER THE NONCOMPLIANT
STATE AGENCY HAS MADE A GOOD FAITH EFFORT TO COMPLETE THE
RECOMMENDATION OF THE AUDIT BY THE IMPLEMENTATION DATE.
(c) (I) IF THE LEGISLATIVE AUDIT COMMITTEE DETERMINES BY A
MAJORITY VOTE THAT THE NONCOMPLIANT STATE AGENCY HAS MADE A
GOOD FAITH EFFORT TO IMPLEMENT THE RECOMMENDATION BY THE
IMPLEMENTATION DATE, THE COMMITTEE MAY ACCEPT AN EXTENDED
IMPLEMENTATION DATE PROVIDED BY THE NONCOMPLIANT STATE
AGENCY.
(II) IF THE LEGISLATIVE AUDIT COMMITTEE DETERMINES BY A
MAJORITY VOTE THAT THE NONCOMPLIANT STATE AGENCY HAS NOT MADE
A GOOD FAITH EFFORT TO IMPLEMENT THE RECOMMENDATION BY THE
IMPLEMENTATION DATE, THE COMMITTEE MAY DIRECT THE STATE
AUDITOR TO TAKE THE ACTIONS SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (9.6)(e) OF THIS
SECTION.
(d) IF THE LEGISLATIVE AUDIT COMMITTEE EXTENDS THE
IMPLEMENTATION DATE AS SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (9.6)(c)(I) OF THIS
SECTION AND THE NONCOMPLIANT STATE AGENCY DOES NOT COMPLETE
THE AUDIT RECOMMENDATION BY THE EXTENDED IMPLEMENTATION DATE,
THE LEGISLATIVE AUDIT COMMITTEE MAY AGAIN DETERMINE WHETHER
THE NONCOMPLIANT STATE AGENCY MADE A GOOD FAITH EFFORT TO
IMPLEMENT THE AUDIT RECOMMENDATION PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(9.6)(b) OF THIS SECTION AND MAY THEN TAKE EITHER ACTION SPECIFIED
IN SUBSECTION (9.6)(c) OF THIS SECTION.
-3- HB26-1254

(e) THE LEGISLATIVE AUDIT COMMITTEE, BY A MAJORITY VOTE OF
THE COMMITTEE, MAY DIRECT THE STATE AUDITOR TO NOTIFY THE STATE
CONTROLLER WHEN A NONCOMPLIANT STATE AGENCY HAS NOT MADE A
GOOD FAITH EFFORT TO COMPLETE AN AUDIT RECOMMENDATION BY THE
IMPLEMENTATION DATE.
(f) THE STATE AUDITOR SHALL MAKE ONLY ONE NOTIFICATION
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (9.6)(e) OF THIS SECTION FOR A NONCOMPLIANT
STATE AGENCY FOR A SINGLE AUDIT, REGARDLESS OF THE NUMBER OF
AUDIT RECOMMENDATIONS THAT CAUSED THE STATE AGENCY TO BECOME
A NONCOMPLIANT STATE AGENCY.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 24-30-211 as
follows:
24-30-211. Restriction of general fund appropriation - state
agency noncompliance with audit requirements - state auditor notice.
IF THE STATE CONTROLLER RECEIVES NOTICE FROM THE STATE
AUDITOR OF A NONCOMPLIANT STATE AGENCY PURSUANT TO SECTION
2-3-103 (9.6), THE STATE CONTROLLER SHALL RESTRICT, IN AN AMOUNT
EQUAL TO THREE PERCENT OF THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE NONCOMPLIANT
STATE AGENCY'S GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS, THE NONCOMPLIANT
STATE AGENCY'S APPROPRIATIONS FOR THE FISCAL YEAR FOLLOWING THE
FISCAL YEAR IN WHICH THE STATE CONTROLLER RECEIVES THE NOTICE
FROM THE STATE AUDITOR. THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY ENACT A BILL
TO RELEASE THE RESTRICTION, OR THE LEGISLATIVE AUDIT COMMITTEE
MAY, BY MAJORITY VOTE, DIRECT THE STATE AUDITOR TO NOTIFY THE
STATE CONTROLLER TO RESCIND THE RESTRICTION IF THE STATE AUDITOR
DETERMINES THAT THE STATE AGENCY HAS BECOME COMPLIANT BEFORE
THE RESTRICTION TAKES EFFECT.
-4- HB26-1254

SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-5- HB26-1254